District of Columbia statutes.
3-1209.02

Dance and recreation therapy.

(a)

Any person who practices or offers to practice dance therapy or recreation therapy in the District shall register with the Mayor on forms prescribed by the Mayor, reregister at intervals the Mayor may require by rule, and pay the registration fee established by the Mayor.

(b)

A person registered to practice dance therapy or recreation therapy may employ the theories and techniques of the profession, in accordance with appropriate ethical requirements, to aid in the restoration and rehabilitation of mental and physical functions.

(c)

The Mayor shall, by rule, set forth standards of education and experience required to qualify for registration as a dance therapist or recreation therapist and, in doing so, may adopt the standards of the recognized national professional associations of dance therapists or recreation therapists.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 902, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3309.2.